apertium-sh-mk.sh.dix
    <pardef n="gong__n"    >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="zmaj__n"    >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>em</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>eva</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="plač__n"    >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>em</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>eva</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="mraz__n"    >
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
      <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
      <e><p><l>eve</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
      <e><p><l>evi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>evima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
  </pardef>
  <pardef n="pop__n"    >
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
    <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="ma" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="snop__n"    >
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="sg" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="nom" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="gen" /></r></p></e>     
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="dat" /></r></p></e>    
      <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="acc" /></r></p></e>    
      <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="voc" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="loc" /></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n" /><s n="mi" /><s n="pl" /><s n="ins" /></r></p></e>
  </pardef>

<e lm="gong"><i>gong</i><par n="gong__n" /></e>
<e lm="zmaj"><i>zmaj</i><par n="zmaj__n" /></e>
<e lm="plač"><i>plač</i><par n="plač__n" /></e>
<e lm="mraz"><i>mraz</i><par n="mraz__n" /></e>
<e lm="pop"><i>pop</i><par n="pop__n" /></e>
<e lm="snop"><i>snop</i><par n="snop__n" /></e>
